California statutes. Penal Code
(b) The Legislature finds and declares that the level of production, distribution, and sale of narcotics in small counties in this state threatens the well-being not only of citizens of those counties, but of the rest of the state as well. Since many of these counties have experienced less growth in their general purpose revenues than the rest of the state, and yet are required to bear the burden of funding disproportionate criminal justice costs associated with the production, distribution, and sale of narcotics, the Legislature recognizes the need to provide financial assistance for these counties.

(c) The Legislature intends to support intensified efforts by district attorneys’ offices to prosecute drug producers and sellers through organizational and operational techniques that have been proven effective in selected jurisdictions in this and other states.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 306, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

13881.

(a) There is hereby established in the office a program of financial and technical assistance for district attorneys’ offices, designated the California Major Narcotic Vendors Prosecution Law. All funds appropriated to the office for the purposes of this chapter shall be administered and disbursed by the director in consultation with the California Council on Criminal Justice, and shall to the greatest extent feasible be coordinated or consolidated with federal funds that may be made available for these purposes.

(b) The director is authorized to allocate and award funds to counties in which the California Major Narcotic Vendors Prosecution Law is implemented in substantial compliance
 with the policies and criteria set forth in this chapter.

(c) The allocation and award of funds shall be made upon application executed by the county’s district attorney and approved by its board of supervisors. Funds disbursed under this chapter shall not supplant local funds that would, in the absence of the California Major Narcotic Vendors Prosecution Law, be made available to support the prosecution of felony drug cases. Funds available under this program shall not be subject to review, as specified in Section 14780 of the Government Code.

(d) The director shall prepare and issue written program and administrative guidelines and procedures for the California Major Narcotic Vendors Prosecution Program consistent with this chapter, which shall be submitted to the Chairpersons
 of the Assembly Committee on Public Safety and the Senate Committee on Criminal Procedure. These guidelines shall permit the selection of a county for the allocation and award of funds only on a finding by the office that the county is experiencing a proportionately significant increase in major narcotic cases. Further, the guidelines shall provide for the allocation and award of funds to small county applicants, as designated by the director. The guidelines shall also provide that any funds received by a county under this chapter shall be used only for the prosecution of cases involving major narcotic dealers. For purposes of this subdivision, “small county” means a county having a population of 200,000 or less.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 460.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

13882.

California major narcotic vendors prosecution units receiving funds under this chapter shall concentrate enhanced prosecution efforts and resources upon individuals identified under selection criteria set forth in Section 13883. Enhanced prosecution efforts and resources shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(a) “Vertical” prosecutorial representation, whereby the prosecutor who makes the initial filing or appearance in a drug case will perform all subsequent court appearances on that particular case through its conclusion, including the sentencing phase.

(b) Assignment of highly qualified investigators and prosecutors to drug cases.

(c) Significant reduction of caseloads for investigators and prosecutors assigned to drug cases.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1424, Sec. 1.   Effective September 26, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

13883.

(a) An individual may be the subject of the California Major Narcotic Vendors Prosecution Law prosecution efforts who is under arrest for the commission or attempted commission of one or more felonies relating to controlled substances in violation of Section 11351, 11352, 11358, 11378, 11378.5, 11379, 11379.5, or 11383 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) In applying the criteria set forth in subdivision (a), a district attorney may, consistent with the provisions of subdivision (d) of Section 13881, elect to limit drug prosecution efforts to persons arrested for any one or more of the felonies listed in subdivision (a) if crime statistics demonstrate that the incidence of that felony or felonies presents a particularly serious problem in the county.

(c) In exercising the prosecutorial discretion granted by this section, the district attorney shall consider (1) the character, background, and prior criminal background of the defendant, and (2) the number and the seriousness of the offenses currently charged against the defendant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1424, Sec. 1.   Effective September 26, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

13884.

(a) Each district attorney’s office establishing a California major narcotic vendors prosecution unit and receiving state support under this chapter shall adopt and pursue the following policies for the California Major Narcotic Vendors Prosecution Law cases:

(1) All reasonable prosecutorial efforts shall be made to resist the pretrial release of a charged defendant selected for prosecution under the California Major Narcotic Vendors Prosecution Law.

(2) All reasonable prosecutorial efforts shall be made to persuade the court to impose the most severe authorized sentence upon a person convicted after prosecution under the California Major Narcotic Vendors Prosecution Law.

(3) All reasonable prosecutorial efforts shall be made to reduce the time between arrest and disposition of charge against an individual selected for prosecution under the California Major Narcotic Vendors Prosecution Law.

(b) The selection criteria set forth in Section 13883 shall be adhered to for each California Major Narcotic Vendors Prosecution Law case unless, in the reasonable exercise of prosecutor’s discretion, extraordinary circumstances require the departure from those policies in order to promote the general purposes and intent of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1424, Sec. 1.   Effective September 26, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9.5. Statewide Sexual Predator Apprehension Team [13885. - 13885.8.]

13885.

The Legislature hereby finds that a substantial and disproportionate amount of sexual offenses are committed against the people of California by a relatively small number of multiple and repeat sex offenders. In enacting this chapter, the Legislature intends to support efforts of the criminal justice community through a focused effort by law enforcement and prosecuting agencies to identify, locate, apprehend, and prosecute sex offenders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 709, Sec. 20.   (SB 1062)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

13885.1.

The Attorney General shall maintain, upon appropriation of funds by the Legislature, a statewide Sexual Predator Apprehension Team force. The Sexual Predator Apprehension Team force shall be comprised of special agent teams throughout California. The teams shall focus on repeat sex offenders, and perform the following activities:

(a) Coordinate state and local investigative resources to apprehend high risk sex offenders and persons required to register under Section 290 who violate the law or conditions of probation or parole.

(b) Target and monitor chronic repeat violent sex offenders before the commission of additional sexual offenses.

(c) Develop profiles
 in unsolved sexual assault cases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 867, Sec. 27.   (SB 1144)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

13885.15.

(a) The special agent teams established pursuant to Section 13885.1 shall also take a proactive role in the investigation and prosecution of preferential child molesters and sexual exploiters.

(b) For purposes of this section, “preferential child molester” means a person whose primary sex drive is directed toward children. A preferential child molester is distinguished from a situational child molester, who will use children sexually in times of stress because of a lack of impulse control or as a result of circumstances.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 876, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

13885.2.

The Attorney General, subject to the availability of funds, shall establish in the Department of Justice the High Risk Sex Offender Program, which is hereby created, which shall receive the Facts of Offense Sheets, pursuant to Section 1203e. The program shall use the scores of sex offenders reported on the Facts of Offense Sheets for the purpose of identifying, assessing, monitoring, and containing those sex offenders at a high risk of reoffending. This shall be a statewide program.

It is the intent of the Legislature that this statewide program shall not affect the operation of the Serious Habitual Offender Program authorized by Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 13890) involving the Counties of San Francisco, San Mateo,
 Santa Clara, Santa Cruz, Alameda, Contra Costa, Napa, Sonoma, Solano, and Marin which shall become inoperative on July 1, 1994.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 709, Sec. 22.   (SB 1062)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

13885.4.

As used in this chapter, “high risk sex offenders” means those persons who are required to register as sex offenders pursuant to the Sex Offender Registration Act and who have been assessed with a score indicating a “high risk” on the SARATSO identified for that person’s specific population as set forth in Section 290.04, or who are identified as being at a high risk of reoffending by the Department of Justice, based on the person’s SARATSO score when considered in combination with other, empirically based risk factors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 709, Sec. 23.   (SB 1062)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

13885.6.

The Department of Justice shall establish and maintain a comprehensive file of existing information maintained by law enforcement agencies, probation departments, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the State Department of State Hospitals, the Department of Motor Vehicles, and the Department of Justice. The Department of Justice may request the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the State Department of State Hospitals, the Department of Motor Vehicles, law enforcement agencies, and probation departments to provide existing information from their files regarding persons identified by the Department of Justice as high risk sex offenders pursuant to Section 13885.4. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the State Department of State Hospitals, the Department of Motor
 Vehicles, law enforcement agencies, and probation departments, when requested by the Department of Justice, shall provide copies of existing information maintained in their files regarding persons identified by the Department of Justice as high risk sex offenders and shall provide followup information to the Department of Justice as it becomes available, unless otherwise prohibited by federal law. This information shall include, but is not limited to, criminal histories, Facts of Offense Sheets, sex offender registration records, police reports, probation and presentencing reports, judicial records and case files, juvenile records, psychological evaluations and psychological hospital reports, and sexually violent predator treatment program reports. This information shall also include records that have been sealed. This information shall be provided to the Department of Justice in a manner and format jointly approved by the submitting department and the Department of Justice. This high risk sex offender file
 shall be maintained by the Department of Justice High Risk Sex Offender Program and shall contain a complete physical description and method of operation of the high risk sex offender, information describing his or her interaction with criminal justice agencies, and his or her prior criminal record. The Department of Justice also shall prepare a bulletin on each high risk sex offender for distribution to law enforcement agencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 54.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

13885.8.

The Department of Justice shall electronically provide a bulletin on each high risk sex offender to law enforcement agencies via the California Sex Offender Registry database and the California Law Enforcement Web (CLEW).

Upon request, the department shall provide the complete file of information on a high risk sex offender to law enforcement agencies, district attorneys, and the courts for the purpose of identifying, apprehending, prosecuting, and sentencing high risk sex offenders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 709, Sec. 25.   (SB 1062)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9.7. County Sexual Assault Felony Enforcement (SAFE)Team Program [13887. - 13887.4.]

13887.

(a) Any county may establish and implement a sexual assault felony enforcement (SAFE) team program pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that identifying and developing reliable and sustainable funding for SAFE teams established by this chapter, including those established in rural and regional areas, is critical for reducing sexual assaults in California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 219, Sec. 24.   (AB 1844)   Effective September 9, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

13887.1.

(a) The mission of this program shall be to reduce violent sexual assault offenses in the county through proactive surveillance and arrest of habitual sexual offenders, as defined in Section 667.71, and strict enforcement of registration requirements for sex offenders pursuant to Section 290.

(b) The proactive surveillance and arrest authorized by this chapter shall be conducted within the limits of existing statutory and constitutional law.

(c) The mission of this program shall also be to provide community education regarding the purposes of Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 290) of Title 9 of Part 2. The goal of community education is to do all of the following:

(1) Provide information to the public about ways to protect themselves and families from sexual assault.

(2) Emphasize the importance of using the knowledge of the presence of registered sex offenders in the community to enhance public safety.

(3) Explain that harassment or vigilantism against registrants may cause them to disappear and attempt to live without supervision, or to register as transients, which would defeat the purpose of sex offender registration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 337, Sec. 51.   Effective September 20, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

13887.2.

The regional SAFE teams may consist of officers and agents from the following law enforcement agencies:

(a) Police departments.

(b) Sheriff’s departments.

(c) The Bureau of Investigations of the Office of the District Attorney.

(d) County probation departments.

(e) To the extent that these agencies have available resources, the following law enforcement agencies:

(1) The Department of Justice.

(2) The Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(3) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(4) The Federal Bureau of Investigation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 867, Sec. 28.   (SB 1144)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

13887.3.

The program established pursuant to this chapter shall have the following objectives:

(a) To identify, monitor, arrest, and assist in the prosecution of habitual sexual offenders who violate the terms and conditions of their probation or parole, who fail to comply with the registration requirements of Section 290, or who commit new sexual assault offenses.

(b) To collect data to determine if the proactive law enforcement procedures adopted by the program are effective in reducing violent sexual assault offenses.

(c) To develop procedures for operating a multijurisdictional regional task force.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1090, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

13887.4.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize the otherwise unlawful violation of any person’s rights under the law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1090, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. California Forensic Science Laboratory Enhancement Program [13890. - 13891.]

13890.

It is the intent of the Legislature to review the needs assessment report, as provided for in Section 13892, prior to providing additional funds for support of local forensic laboratory services or improvements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 931, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

13891.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the California Forensic Science Laboratory Enhancement Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 931, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Victims’ Legal Resource Center [13897. - 13897.3.]

13897.

The Legislature finds and declares each of the following:

(a) The citizens of California have expressed great concern for the plight of crime victims.

(b) It is in the best interest, not only of the victims and their families, but also of all the citizens of California to ensure that crime victims receive comprehensive assistance in overcoming the effects of victimization.

(c) While many options and rights exist for the crime victim, including providing financial assistance pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 13959) of Part 4 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, participation in sentencing and parole eligibility hearings of criminal perpetrators, civil litigation against the perpetrator and third parties, assistance from victim-witness programs, and private support and counseling services, research indicates that many crime victims suffer needlessly because they are not aware of these options and rights, or are apprehensive or uncertain about where to go for assistance or how to exercise their rights.

(d) It is thus necessary to provide a resource center, statewide in scope, where victims of crime, their families, and providers of services to victims of crime can receive referral information, assistance, and legal guidance in order to deal effectively with the needs of victims of crime and minimize the continuing victimization process, which often results from a complex justice system. This resource center shall be independent, offer victims assistance in understanding and effectively exercising their legal rights, provide information about their rights and the workings of the criminal justice system, and direct them to appropriate local resources and agencies which can offer further assistance. The resource center shall provide, on a statewide basis, information assistance for all crime victims without charge and shall complement the efforts of various local programs, including victim-witness programs, rape crisis units, domestic violence projects, and child abuse centers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1640, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

13897.1.

(a) There shall be established a resource center that shall provide legal and other information for crime victims, their families, and providers of services to crime victims through a statewide, toll-free telephone number and an internet website. The resource center shall provide information and educational materials discussing crime victims’ legal rights. The resource center shall distribute these materials to administrative agencies, law enforcement agencies, crime
 victim-service programs, local, regional, and statewide education systems, appropriate human service agencies, and political, social, civic, and religious leaders and organizations.

(b) As used in this chapter, “provider of services to crime victims” means any hospital, doctor, attorney, local or statewide rape crisis center, domestic violence center, child abuse counseling center, or victims’ witness center that seeks to assist crime victims in understanding and exercising their legal rights,
 including, but not limited to, those rights under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 13959) of Part 4 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 105, Sec. 1.   (SB 86)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

13897.2.

(a) The Office of Emergency Services shall grant an award to an appropriate private, nonprofit organization, to provide a statewide resource center, as described in Section 13897.1.

(b) The resource center shall:

(1) Provide users with information about victims’ legal rights to compensation pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 13959) of Part 4 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government
 Code and, where appropriate, provide victims with guidance in exercising these rights.

(2) Provide users who provide services to victims of crime with legal information regarding the legal rights of crime victims.

(3) Advise users about any potential civil causes of action and,
 where appropriate, provide callers with references to local legal aid and lawyer referral services.

(4) Advise and assist
 users in understanding and implementing their rights to participate in sentencing and parole eligibility hearings as provided by statute.

(5) Advise users about victims’ rights in the criminal justice system, assist them in overcoming problems, including the return of property, and inform them of any procedures protecting witnesses.

(6) Refer users, as appropriate, to local programs, which include victim-witness programs, rape crisis units, domestic
 violence projects, and child sexual abuse centers.

(7) Refer
 users to local resources for information about appropriate public and private benefits and the means of obtaining aid.

(8) Publicize the existence of the toll-free service and internet website through the print and electronic media, including public service announcements, brochures, press announcements, various other educational materials, and agreements for the provision of publicity, by private entities.

(9) Compile comprehensive referral lists of local resources that include the following: crime victims’ assistance resources, including legal and medical services, financial assistance, personal counseling and support services,
 and
 crime victims’ support groups.

(10) Produce promotional materials for distribution to law enforcement agencies, state and local agencies, print, radio, and television media outlets, and the general public. These materials shall include placards, video and audio training materials, written handbooks, and brochures for public distribution. Distribution of these materials shall be coordinated with the local crime victims’ service programs.

(11) Research, compile, and maintain a library of legal information concerning crime victims and their rights.

(12) Provide a
 20-percent-minimum cash match for all funds appropriated pursuant to this
 chapter, which may include federal and private funds in order to supplement any funds appropriated by the Legislature.

(c) The resource center shall be located so as to assure convenient and regular access between the resource center and those state agencies most concerned with crime victims. The entity receiving the grant shall be a private, nonprofit organization, independent of law enforcement agencies, and have qualified staff knowledgeable in the legal rights of crime victims and the programs and services available to crime victims throughout the state. The subgrantee shall have an existing statewide,
 toll-free information service
 and internet website and have demonstrated substantial capacity and experience serving crime victims in areas required by this act.

(d) The internet website maintained pursuant to this section shall include a summary of crime victims’ rights and resources in plain language, including, but not limited to:

(1) Information about victims’ rights, including the disclosures required under Section 679.026 and the information required by paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 679.027.

(2) Links to victim resources offered by the state and by each county.

(3) Additional links or resources from public or private entities that the center determines are relevant and appropriate.

(4) A summary of the California criminal justice process.

(5) Information on obtaining restitution from the California Victim Compensation Board.

(6) Information on obtaining legal protections for victims and their families.

(e) The services of the resource center shall not duplicate the victim service activities of the Office of Emergency Services or those activities of local victim programs funded through the Office of Emergency Services.

(f) The subgrantee shall be compensated at its federally approved indirect cost rate, if any. For the purposes of this section, “federally approved indirect cost rate” means that rate established by the federal Department of Health and Human Services or other federal agency for the subgrantee.
 This section does not require the Office of Emergency Services to permit the use of federally approved indirect cost rates for other subgrantees of other grants administered by the Office of Emergency Services.

(g) All information and records retained by the center in the course of providing services under this chapter shall be confidential and privileged pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 950) of Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Evidence Code and Article 4 (commencing with Section 6060) of Chapter 4 of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code. Nothing in this subdivision shall prohibit compilation and distribution
 of statistical data by the center.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 105, Sec. 2.   (SB 86)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

13897.3.

The Office of Emergency Services shall develop written guidelines for funding and performance standards for monitoring the effectiveness of the resource center program. The program shall be evaluated by a public or private nonprofit entity under a contract with the Office of Emergency Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 462.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12. County Sexual Assault Response Team (SART) Program [13898. - 13898.2.]

13898.

(a) Each county may establish and implement an interagency sexual assault response team (SART) program for the purpose of providing a forum for interagency cooperation and coordination, to assess and make recommendations for the improvement in the local sexual assault intervention system, and to facilitate improved communication and working relationships to effectively address the problem of sexual assault in California.

(b) Each SART program shall be established and implemented pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   (AB 1475)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13898.1.

(a) Each SART may consist of representatives of the following public and private agencies or organizations:

(1) Law enforcement agencies.

(2) County district attorneys’ offices.

(3) Rape crisis centers.

(4) Local sexual assault forensic examination teams.

(5) Crime laboratories.

(b) Dependent upon local needs and goals, each SART may include representatives of the following public and private agencies or organizations:

(1) Child protective services.

(2) Local victim and witness assistance centers.

(3) County public health departments.

(4) County mental health services departments.

(5) Forensic interview centers.

(6) University and college Title IX coordinators.

(7) University and college police departments.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   (AB 1475)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13898.2.

The program established pursuant to this chapter shall have the following objectives:

(a) Review of local sexual assault intervention undertaken by all disciplines to promote effective intervention and best practices.

(b) Assessment of relevant trends, including drug-facilitated sexual assault, the incidence of predatory date rape, and human sex trafficking.

(c) Evaluation of the
 cost-effectiveness and feasibility of a per capita funding model for local sexual assault forensic examination teams to achieve stability for this component of the SART program.

(d) Evaluation of the effectiveness of individual agency and interagency protocols and systems by conducting case reviews of cases involving sexual assault.

(e) Plan and implement effective prevention strategies and collaborate with other agencies and educational institutions to address sexual assault perpetrated by strangers, sexual assault perpetrated by persons known to the victim, including, but not limited to, a friend, family member, or general acquaintance of the victim, predatory date rape, risks associated with binge alcohol drinking, and drug-facilitated sexual
 assault.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   (AB 1475)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 13. Retail Theft Prevention Program [13899. - 13899.]

13899.

The Department of the California Highway Patrol shall, in coordination with the Department of Justice, convene a regional property crimes task force to assist local law enforcement and railroad police, as described in Section 8226 of the Public Utilities Code, in counties identified by the Department of the California Highway Patrol as having elevated levels of property crime, including, but not limited to, organized retail theft, cargo theft, vehicle burglary, and theft of vehicle parts and accessories. The task force shall provide local law enforcement and railroad police
 in the identified region with logistical support and other law enforcement resources, including, but not limited to, personnel and equipment, as determined to be appropriate by the Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol in consultation with the task force members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 167, Sec. 1.   (AB 1972)   Effective August 16, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 6.5. LOCAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE PLANNING [13900. - 13908.]

13900.

The Legislature finds and declares:

(a) That crime is a local problem that must be dealt with by state and local governments if it is to be controlled effectively.

(b) That criminal justice needs and problems vary greatly among the different local jurisdictions of this state.

(c) That effective planning and coordination can be accomplished only through the direct, immediate and continuing cooperation of local officials charged with general governmental and criminal justice agency
 responsibilities.

(d) That planning for the efficient use of criminal justice resources requires a permanent coordinating effort on the part of local governments and local criminal justice and delinquency prevention agencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1230.)
-------------------------------------------

13901.

(a) For the purposes of coordinating local criminal justice activities and planning for the use of state and federal action funds made available through any grant programs, criminal justice and delinquency prevention planning districts shall be established.

(b) On January 1, 1976, all planning district boundaries shall remain as they were
 immediately prior to that date. Thereafter, the number and boundaries of those planning districts may be altered from time to time pursuant to this section; provided that no county shall be divided into two or more districts, nor shall two or more counties which do not comprise a contiguous area form a single district.

(c) Prior to taking any action to alter the boundaries of any planning district, the council shall adopt a resolution indicating its intention to take the action and, at least 90 days prior to the taking of the action, shall forward a copy of the resolution to all units of government directly affected by the proposed action.

(d) If any county or a majority of the cities directly affected by the proposed action objects thereto, and a copy of the resolution of each board of supervisors or city council stating its objection is delivered to the Director of Emergency
 Services within 30 days following the giving of the notice of the proposed action, the director shall conduct a public meeting within the boundaries of the district as they are proposed to be determined. Notice of the time and place of the meeting shall be given to the public and to all units of local government directly affected by the proposed action, and reasonable opportunity shall be given to members of the public and representatives of those units to present their views on the proposed action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 463.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

13902.

Each county placed within a single county planning district may constitute a planning district upon execution of a joint powers agreement or arrangement acceptable to the county and to at least that one-half of the cities in the district which contain at least one-half of the population of the district. Counties placed within a multicounty planning district may constitute a planning district upon execution of a joint powers agreement or other arrangement acceptable to the participating counties and to at least that one-half of the cities in such district which contain at least one-half of the population of such district. If no combination of one-half of the cities of a district
 contains at least one-half of the population of the district, then agreement of any half of the cities in such district is sufficient to enable execution of joint powers agreements or other acceptable arrangements for constituting planning districts.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1230.)
-------------------------------------------

13903.

Planning districts may be the recipients of criminal justice and delinquency prevention planning or coordinating funds made available to units of general local government or combinations of units of general local government by federal or state law. Such planning districts shall establish local criminal justice and delinquency prevention planning boards, but shall not be obligated to finance their activities in the event that federal or state support of such activities is lacking.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1230.)
-------------------------------------------

13904.

(a) The membership of each local board shall be consistent with state and federal statutes and guidelines; shall be representative of a broad range of community interests and viewpoints; and shall be balanced in terms of racial, sexual, age, economic, and geographic factors. Each local board shall consist of not less than 21 and not more than 30 members, a majority of whom shall be locally elected officials.

(b) The California Council on Criminal Justice shall promulgate standards to ensure that the composition of each board complies with subdivision (a). The council shall annually review the
 composition of each board, and if it finds that the composition of a local board complies with the standards, it shall so certify. Certification shall be effective for one year; provided that if the membership of a board changes by more than 25 percent during a period of certification, the council may withdraw the certificate prior to its expiration.

(c) If the council determines that the composition of a local board does not comply with the standards, it shall direct the appropriate appointing authority to reappoint the local board and shall again review the composition pursuant to this section after such reappointments are made. The council may void decisions made by such board after such finding and due notice. The council may approve the allocation of planning or action funds only to those districts which have been certified pursuant to this section.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1230.)
-------------------------------------------

13905.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 13904, representatives of the public shall be appointed to local criminal justice and delinquency prevention planning boards, of a number not to exceed the number of representatives of government on that board. At least one-fifth of the membership of such boards shall be representatives of citizens, professional and community organizations, including organizations directly related to delinquency prevention.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1230.)
-------------------------------------------

13906.

Planning boards may contract with other public or private entities for the performance of services, may appoint an executive officer and other employees, and may receive and expend funds in order to carry out planning and coordinating responsibility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1047.)
-------------------------------------------

13908.

(a) The Office of Criminal Justice Planning shall undertake a study to determine whether it would be feasible to develop a state-operated center on computer forensics for the purpose of collecting, compiling, and analyzing information, including evidence seized in connection with criminal proceedings, in computer formats to provide assistance to state and local law enforcement agencies in the investigation and prosecution of crimes involving computer technology.

(b) The office shall involve state and local law enforcement agencies as well as representatives of the computer industry in the development of the feasibility study required by this section.

(c) The office shall report its findings and conclusions to the Legislature on or before June 30, 2000.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 13980 by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 409.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 7.5. THE HERTZBERG-LESLIE WITNESS PROTECTION ACT [14020. - 14033.]

14020.

There is hereby established the Witness Relocation and Assistance Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 455, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

14021.

As used in this title:
